test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-50helisemae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - helisemä: # Verb (50) helisemä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     helisemä+V+Inf/mA: helisemä
     helisemä+V+Inf: helistäq
     helisemä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: helisnüq
     helisemä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: helist

     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: helise
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: heliset
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: helises
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: helisemiq
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: helisetiq
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: heliseseq
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: helise
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: helisi
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: helisit
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: helisi
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: helisimiq
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: helisitiq
     helisemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: helisiq

     helisemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: helisedäs

     helisemä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: helisev

     helisemä+V+Jus: heliskuq
